Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1090
State Entomologist; position created; duties.

There is hereby created in the department and under the direction of the Director of Agriculture the position of State Entomologist. Such person shall be a graduate of a recognized university with a major, or its equivalent, in entomology, plant pathology, or an equivalent biological science and have not less than two years of experience in such field and administrative work. It shall be the duty of the State Entomologist through the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act to protect the interest of Nebraska as stated in section 2-1073, to regulate the distribution of plants, and to assist exporters of plants in meeting the requirements imposed by other states or countries.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 19.